Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1903
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the purposes of sections 8-1901 and 8-1902.

Laws 1995, LB 384, § 8.